Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2427
Public participation; when.

Once the department has made a determination to approve or deny an application for a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, the department shall provide opportunities for public participation, including, but not limited to, public comment, opportunity for public hearing, and agency response to comments, which are at least as stringent as the requirements of the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System in the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.

Laws 2004, LB 916, § 16.